Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.505.180

Second-class school districts—Additional appropriation resolutions—Procedure.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if a second-class school district needs to increase the amount of the appropriation from any fund for any reason, the school district board of directors, before incurring expenditures in excess of appropriation, shall adopt a resolution stating the facts and estimating the amount of additional appropriation needed.

Such resolution shall be voted on at a public meeting, notice to be given in the manner provided by RCW 28A.505.050. Its introduction and passage shall require the vote of a majority of all members of the school district board of directors.

Any person may appear at the meeting at which the appropriation resolution is to be voted on and be heard for or against the adoption thereof.

Upon passage of the appropriation resolution the school district shall petition the superintendent of public instruction for approval to increase the amount of its appropriations in the manner prescribed in rules and regulations for such approval by the superintendent.

Copies of all appropriation resolutions approved by the superintendent of public instruction shall be filed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction with the educational service district.

[ 1990 c 33 s 425; 1984 c 128 s 10; 1983 c 59 s 12; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 18. Formerly RCW 28A.65.485.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—Severability—1983 c 59: See notes following RCW 28A.505.010.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.